apertium-mar.mar.dix
			<e><p><l>मधल्या</l><r>मधे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e><p><l>मधली</l><r>मधे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e><p><l>मधल्या</l><r>मधे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__clit">
			<e><p><l>च्या</l><r>च्या<s n="clit"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_unbound"/></e>
			<e><p><l>च्या</l><r>च्या<s n="clit"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_bound"/></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="__post_unbound"/></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="__post_bound"/></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="__post_bound_no_clit"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__standalone_clit">
			<e><p><l>च्या</l><r>च्या<s n="clit"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__standalone_post">
			<e><p><l>आत</l><r>आत<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>


		<pardef n="__gpr_suff">
			<!-- genitives (CHECK) -->
			<e> 		<p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>ं</l><r>ं<s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>्या</l><r>्या<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e> 		<p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>्या</l><r>ा<s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>्या</l><r>ा<s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>्यां</l><r>ा<s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__pl_case"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>्यां</l><r>ा<s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<!-- pronouns -->

		<pardef n="/मी__prn">
			<e>		  <p><l>मी</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>मला</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>माझ</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>मला</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>माझ्याकडून</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>माझ्यात</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>माझ्या</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_unbound"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>माझ्या</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_bound"/></e>

			<e>		  <p><l>आम्ही</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>आम्हाला</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>आमच</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>आम्हाला</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>आमच्याकडून</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>आमच्यात</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>आम</l><r>मी<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="/तू__prn">
			<e>		  <p><l>तू</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुला</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुझ</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुला</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुझ्याकडून</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुझ्यात</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुझ्या</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_unbound"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुझ्या</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_bound"/></e>

			<e>		  <p><l>तुम्ही</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="excl"/><s n="nom"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुम्हाला</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="excl"/><s n="acc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुमच</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="excl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__prn_gen"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुम्हाला</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="excl"/><s n="dat"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुमच्याकडून</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="excl"/><s n="abl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुमच्यात</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="excl"/><s n="loc"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>		  <p><l>तुम</l><r>तू<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="excl"/><s n="obl"/><j/></r></p><par n="__clit"/></e>
		</pardef>		

		<e lm=""> 								<i></i><par n="__standalone_clit"/></e>
		<e lm="मी">							<i></i><par n="/मी__prn" /></e>
		<e lm="तू">							<i></i><par n="/तू__prn" /></e>
